Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3238
Districts; develop, store, and transport water; water service; powers; limitation.

Each district shall have the power and authority to develop, store and transport water, and to provide, contract for, and furnish water service for domestic purposes, irrigation, milling, manufacturing, mining, metallurgical, and any and all other beneficial uses, and to fix the terms and rates therefor. Each district may acquire, construct, operate, and maintain dams, reservoirs, ground water storage areas, canals, conduits, pipelines, tunnels, and any and all works, facilities, improvements, and property necessary therefor. No district shall contract for delivery of water for irrigation uses within any area served by any irrigation district, public power and irrigation district, or reclamation district, except by consent of and written agreement with such irrigation district, public power and irrigation district, or reclamation district.

Laws 1969, c. 9, § 38, p. 125.